Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

City Administrator

6-4-101. Duties of city administrator.

The board may appoint a city administrator who shall be under the control and direction of the board. The city administrator shall report and be responsible to the board.

The board may, by ordinance, require the city administrator to perform any or all the following duties:

Administer the business of the municipality;

Make recommendations to the board for improving the quality and quantity of public services to be rendered by the officers and employees to the inhabitants of the municipality;

Keep the board fully advised as to the conditions and needs of the municipality;

Report to the board the condition of all property, real and personal, owned by the municipality and recommend repairs or replacements as needed;

Recommend to the board and suggest the priority of programs or projects involving public works or public improvements that should be undertaken by the municipality;

Recommend specific personnel positions, as may be required for the needs and operations of the municipality, and propose personnel policies and procedures for approval of the board; and

Perform such other duties as may from time to time be designated or required by the board.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).